New York, session 2025-2026, A4341.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The director of information technology services, in consul- 2 tation with the advisory council for technology, shall contract with an 3 independent entity to conduct a detailed study of the comparative quali- 4 ties of cloud computing services and state data center operations. Such 5 contract shall be awarded on a competitive basis through a request for 6 proposals process. Such study shall include, but not be limited to the 7 following comparative analyses: cost, value, operational risks, privacy, 8 security, reliability, redundancy and disaster recovery. Such report 9 shall be submitted to the governor, state comptroller, the temporary 10 president of the senate and the speaker of the assembly no later than 11 May 31, 2026. 12 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05135-01-5